District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Public Service Exception Charter Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 402 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 777; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.02), is amended by striking the phrase “convicted
of a felony while holding the office; and (5)” and inserting the phrase “convicted of a felony
while holding the office; (5) has not been expelled from the Council pursuant to section 401(e) in
the 5 years preceding the day on which the general or special election for such office is to be
held; and (6)” in its place. as follows:
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the


fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect as provided in section 303 of the District of Columbia Home
Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 777; D.C. Official Code § 1-203.03).